ko: 가정/원예 용품 > 실내 장식 > 창문 인테리어: 커튼/휘장; 스테인드글라스판; 창문 블라인드/셰이드; 창문 필름; 방충망; 창문 바란스/처마돌림띠
sl-SI: Dom in vrt > Dekoracija > Obdelava oken: Zavese in zastori; Vitraži; Okenske žaluzije in senčila; Folije za okna; Zasloni za okna; Kratke zavese in karnise za okna
pl: Dom i ogród > Ozdoby > Dekoracje okienne: Zasłony i draperie; Panele z kolorowego szkła; Rolety i żaluzje; Folie okienne; Ekrany okienne; Lambrekiny i gzymsy
nb: Hjem og hage > Dekor > Vindusbehandlinger: Forheng og gardiner; Fargede glasspaneler; Persienner og solskjerming; Vindusfilmer; Vindusskjermer; Vindusgesimser
hr-HR: Dom i vrt > Dekoracije > Prozorski ukrasi: Zavjese i draperija; Vitraji; Prozorske rolete i sjenila; Folije za prozore; Mrežice za prozore; Ukrasni zastori i karniše
zh-CN: 家居与园艺 > 装饰 > 窗饰: 窗帘/窗幔; 彩色玻璃板; 百叶窗/遮光帘; 窗户贴膜; 纱窗; 窗帘头/窗幔
pt-PT: Casa e jardim > Decoração > Tratamentos de janelas: Cortinas e reposteiros; Painéis de vitrais; Estores e venezianas; Películas de janelas; Caixilhos de janelas; Sanefas e cornijas de janelas
th: บ้านและสวน > ของประดับตกแต่ง > การตกแต่งหน้าต่าง: ม่านและผ้าแขวน; แผงกระจกสเตนกลาส; ที่กั้นและกำบังหน้าต่าง; ฟิล์มหน้าต่าง; มุ้งลวด; ม่านแขวนและบัวของหน้าต่าง
pt-BR: Casa e jardim > Decoração > Manutenção de janelas: Persianas e cortinas; Painéis de vitrais; Persianas; Películas para janelas; Telas para janelas; Cortinados
it: Casa e giardino > Arredo > Trattamenti per finestre: Tende e tendaggi; Pannelli in vetro colorato; Tende alla veneziana; Pellicola per finestre; Rete per zanzare; Mantovane e cornici
el: Σπίτι & κήπος > Διακόσμηση > Επισκευές παραθύρων: Κουρτίνες & πετάσματα; Πάνελ βιτρό; Περσίδες & ρολά παραθύρων; Μεμβράνες παραθύρων; Σίτες παραθύρων; Διακοσμητικά καλύμματα παραθύρων & γείσα
es: Casa y jardín > Decoración > Tratamientos de la ventana: Cortinas y visillos; Vitrales; Persianas y estores; Láminas para ventana; Mosquiteras para ventanas; Cenefas y cornisas
de: Heim & Garten > Dekoration > Fensterdrapierung: Vorhänge & Gardinen; Buntglasscheiben; Jalousien & Rollos; Fensterfolie; Fliegengitter; Querbehänge
sv: Hem och trädgård > Dekor > Fönsterbehandling: Gardiner och draperier; Färgade fönsterrutor; Markiser och persienner; Fönsterfilm; Myggnät för fönster; Gardinkappor och kornischer
tr: Ev ve Bahçe > Dekor > Pencere Dekorları: Perdeler ve Fon Perdeler; Renkli Cam Panelleri; Pencere Stor ve Jaluzileri; Pencere Filmleri; Pencere Telleri; Pencere Saçak ve Kornişleri
nl: Huis en tuin > Decoratie > Raambekleding: Gordijnen en vitrage; Glas-in-lood-panelen; Luxaflex en rolgordijnen; Ruitenfolie; Raamhorren; Gordijnkappen
lt-LT: Namai ir sodas > Dekoras > Langų apdaila: Užuolaidos; Vitražo plokštės; Langų žaliuzės ir roletai; Langų plėvelės; Langų tinkleliai; Langų karnizai ir karnizų užuolaidos
vi: Nhà và vườn > Trang trí > Giải pháp trang trí cửa sổ: Rèm & màn che; Ô kính nhuộm màu; Mành rèm cửa sổ; Phim dán kính cửa sổ ngăn nhìn trộm; Lưới che cửa sổ; Diềm và mái đua cửa sổ
sk-SK: Dom a záhrada > Dekorácie > Údržba okien: Záclony a závesy; Panely z farebného skla; Okenné rolety a žalúzie; Okenné fólie; Okenné sieťky; Okenné drapérie a rímsy
ja: ホーム・ガーデン > インテリア・エクステリア > 窓用品: カーテン・ドレープカーテン; ステンドグラスパネル; ブラインド・シェード; 窓ガラスフィルム; 窓用網戸; カーテンバランス・上飾り
fr: Maison et jardin > Décorations > Habillages de fenêtre: Rideaux; Vitraux; Stores vénitiens et stores en toile; Films pour vitrages; Moustiquaires pour fenêtre; Lambrequins
ro-RO: Casă și grădină > Decorațiuni > Decorațiuni pentru ferestre: Perdele și draperii; Panouri tip vitraliu; Jaluzele și storuri; Pelicule pentru ferestre; Plase pentru ferestre; Perdele scurte și cornișe pentru ferestre
ru: Дом и сад > Декор > Оформление окон: Занавески и портьеры; Витражные панели; Жалюзи, римские и рулонные шторы; Пленки для окон; Москитные сетки; Ламбрекены и карнизные панели
zh-TW: 居家和庭園 > 裝飾用品 > 窗飾: 窗簾/落地窗簾; 彩色玻璃窗面; 百葉窗; 隔熱膜; 紗窗; 簾頭和窗框
da: Hjem og have > Indretning > Vinduesudsmykning: Gardiner og draperier; Paneler med glasmosaik; Rullegardiner og mørklægningsgardiner; Vinduesfilm; Vinduesskærme; Gardinkapper og stilkapper
fi: Koti ja puutarha > Koristeet > Ikkunan näkösuojat: Verhot; Lasimaalauspaneelit; Sälekaihtimet ja rullaverhot; Ikkunakalvot; Ikkunasuojat; Ikkunakapat ja -korniisit
en: Home & Garden > Decor > Window Treatments: Curtains & Drapes; Stained Glass Panels; Window Blinds & Shades; Window Films; Window Screens; Window Valances & Cornices
cs: Dům a zahrada > Bytové doplňky a dekorace > Okenní dekorace: Záclony a závěsy; Vitrážové panely; Žaluzie a rolety; Okenní fólie; Síťky do oken; Záclonky
hu: Otthon és kert > Dekoráció > Ablakkezelések: Függönyök és drapériák; Ólomüveg-panelek; Ablakredőnyök és -árnyékolók; Ablakfóliák; Ablakképernyők; Ablakkarnisok és -párkányok
bg-BG: Дом и градина > Декорация > Декорация за прозорци: Пердета и завеси; Витражи; Щори и сенници за прозорци; Фолиа за прозорци; Паравани за прозорци; Ламбрекени и декоративни корнизи за прозорци